en: Do not breathe vapour, S23.4
de: Dampf nicht einatmen, S23.4
dk: Undgå indånding af dampe, S23.4
es: No respirar los vapores, S23.4
fi: Vältettävä höyryn hengittämistä, S23.4
fr: Ne pas respirer les fumées, S23.4
it: Non respirare i vapori, S23.4
nl: Damp niet inademen, S23.4
no: Unngå innånding av damp, S23.4
pt: Não respirar os fumos, S23.4
sv: Förhindra spridning av ånga i luften på arbetsplatsen eller använd andningsskydd, S23.4

en: Do not breathe aerosol, S23.5
de: Aerosol nicht einatmen, S23.5
dk: Undgå indånding af aerosol-tåger, S23.5
es: No respirar los aerosoles, S23.5
fi: Vältettävä aerosolisumun hengittämistä, S23.5
fr: Ne pas respirer les aérosols, S23.5
it: Non respirare i aerosoli, S23.5
nl: Spuitnevel niet inademen, S23.5
no: Unngå innånding av sprøytetåke, S23.5
pt: Não respirar os aerossóis, S23.5
sv: Förhindra spridning av dimma i luften på arbetsplatsen eller använd andningsskydd, S23.5

en: Do not breathe gas, S23.6
de: Gas nicht einatmen, S23.6
dk: Undgå indånding af gas, S23.6
es: No respirar los gases, S23.6
fi: Vältettävä kaasun hengittämistä, S23.6
fr: Ne pas respirer les gaz, S23.6
it: Non respirare i gas, S23.6
nl: Gas niet inademen, S23.6
no: Unngå innånding av gass, S23.6
pt: Não respirar os gáses, S23.6
sv: Förhindra spridning av gas i luften på arbetsplatsen eller använd andningsskydd, S23.6

en: Do not breathe smoke, S23.7
de: Rauch nicht einatmen, S23.7
dk: Undgå indånding af røg, S23.7
es: No respirar los humos, S23.7
fi: Vältettävä huurun hengittämistä, S23.7
fr: Ne pas respirer les vapeurs, S23.7
it: Non respirare i fumi, S23.7
nl: Rook niet inademen, S23.7
no: Unngå innånding av røyk, S23.7
pt: Não respirar os vapores, S23.7
sv: Förhindra spridning av rök i luften på arbetsplatsen eller använd andningsskydd, S23.7

en: Avoid contact with skin, S24
cs: Zamezte styku s kůží, S24
de: Berührung mit der Haut vermeiden, S24
dk: Undgå kontakt med huden, S24
el: Αποφεύγετε την επαφή µε το δέρµα, S24
es: Evítese el contacto con la piel, S24
et: Vältida kokkupuudet nahaga, S24
fi: Varottava kemikaalin joutumista iholle, S24
fr: Éviter le contact avec la peau, S24
hu: A bőrrel való érintkezés kerülendő, S24
it: Evitare il contatto con la pelle, S24
lt: Vengti patekimo ant odos, S24
lv: Nepieļaut nokļūšanu uz ādas, S24
mt: Evita l-kuntatt mal-ġilda, S24
nl: Aanraking met de huid vermijden, S24
no: Unngå hudkontakt, S24
pl: Unikać zanieczyszczenia skóry, S24
pt: Evitar o contacto com a pele, S24
sk: Zabráňte kontaktu s pokožkou, S24
sl: Preprečiti stik s kožo, S24
sv: Undvik kontakt med huden, S24

en: Avoid contact with skin and eyes, S24/25
cs: Zamezte styku s kůží a očima, S24/25
de: Berührung mit den Augen und der Haut vermeiden, S24/25
dk: Undgå kontakt med huden og øjnene, S24/25
el: Αποφεύγετε επαφή µε το δέρµα και µε τα µάτια, S24/25
es: Evitese el contacto con los ojos y la piel, S24/25
et: Vältida kemikaali sattumist nahale ja silma, S24/25
fi: Varottava kemikaalin joutumista iholle ja silmiin, S24/25
fr: Éviter le contact avec la peau et les yeux, S24/25
hu: Kerülni kell a bőrrel való érintkezést és a szembe jutást, S24/25
it: Evitare il contatto con gli occhi e con la pelle, S24/25
lt: Vengti patekimo ant odos ir į akis, S24/25
lv: Nepieļaut nokļūšanu uz ādas un acīs, S24/25
mt: Evita l-kuntatt mal-ġilda u l-għajnejn, S24/25
nl: Aanraking met de ogen en de huid vermijden, S24/25
no: Unngå kontakt med huden og øynene, S24/25
pl: Unikać zanieczyszczenia skóry i oczu, S24/25
pt: Evitar o contacto com a pele e os olhos, S24/25
sk: Zabráňte kontaktu s pokožkou a očami, S24/25
sl: Preprečiti stik s kožo in očmi, S24/25
sv: Undvik kontakt med huden eller ögonen, S24/25

en: Avoid contact with eyes, S25
cs: Zamezte styku s očima, S25
de: Berührung mit den Augen vermeiden, S25
dk: Undgå kontakt med øjnene, S25
el: Αποφεύγετε την επαφή µε τα µάτια, S25
es: Evítese el contacto con los ojos, S25
et: Vältida silma sattumist, S25
fi: Varottava kemikaalin joutumista silmiin, S25
fr: Éviter le contact avec les yeux, S25
hu: Kerülni kell a szembe jutást, S25
it: Evitare il contatto con gli occhi, S25
lt: Vengti patekimo į akis, S25
lv: Nepieļaut nokļūšanu acīs, S25
mt: Evita l-kuntatt ma' l-għajnejn, S25
nl: Aanraking met de ogen vermijden, S25
no: Unngå kontakt med øynene, S25
pl: Unikać zanieczyszczenia oczu, S25
pt: Evitar o contacto com os olhos, S25
sk: Zabráňte kontaktu s očami, S25
sl: Preprečiti stik z očmi, S25
sv: Undvik kontakt med ögonen, S25

en: In case of contact with eyes\, rinse immediately with plenty of water and seek medical advice, S26
cs: Při zasažení očí okamžitě důkladně vypláchněte vodou a vyhledejte lékařskou pomoc, S26
de: Bei Berührung mit den Augen sofort gründlich mit Wasser abspülen und Arzt konsultieren, S26
dk: Kommer stoffet i øjnene\, skylles straks grundigt med vand og læge kontaktes, S26
el: Σε περίπτωση επαφής µε τα µάτια πλύνετέ τα αµέσως µε άφθονο νερό και ζητήστε ιατρική συµβουλή, S26
es: En caso de contacto con los ojos\, lávense inmediata y abundantemente con agua y acúdase a un médico, S26
et: Silma sattumisel loputada koheselt rohke veega ja pöörduda arsti poole, S26
fi: Roiskeet silmistä huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla vedellä ja mentävä lääkäriin, S26
fr: En cas de contact avec les yeux\, laver immédiatement et abondamment avec de l'eau et consulter un spécialiste, S26
hu: Ha szembe jut\, bő vízzel azonnal ki kell mosni és orvoshoz kell fordulni, S26
it: In caso di contatto con gli occhi\, lavare immediatamente e abbondantemente con acqua e consultare un medico, S26
lt: Patekus į akis\, nedelsiant gerai praplauti vandeniu ir kreiptis į gydytoją, S26
lv: Ja nokļūst acīs\, nekavējoties tās skalot ar lielu daudzumu ūdens un meklēt medicīnisku palīdzību, S26
mt: F'każ ta' kuntatt ma' l-għajnejn\, aħsel immedjatament b'ħafna ilma u ara tabib, S26
nl: Bij aanraking met de ogen onmiddellijk met overvloedig water afspoelen en deskundig medisch advies inwinnen, S26
no: Får man stoffet i øynene\, skyll straks grundig med store mengder vann og kontakt lege, S26
pl: Zanieczyszczone oczy przemyć natychmiast dużą ilością wody i zasięgnąć porady lekarza, S26
pt: Em caso de contacto com os olhos\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com água e consultar um especialista, S26
sk: V prípade kontaktu s očami je potrebné ihned’ ich vymyt’ s vel’kým množstvom vody a vyhl’adat’ lekársku pomoc, S26
sl: Če pride v oči\, takoj izpirati z obilo vode in poiskati zdravniško pomoč, S26
sv: Vid kontakt med ögonen\, spola genast med mycket vattenoch kontakta lä kare, S26

en: Take off immediately all contaminated clothing, S27
cs: Okamžitě odložte veškeré kontaminované oblečení, S27
de: Beschmutzte\, getränkte Kleidung sofort ausziehen, S27
dk: Tilsmudset tøj tages straks af, S27
el: Αφαιρέστε αµέσως όλα τα ενδύµατα που έχουν µολυνθεί, S27
es: Quítese inmediatamente la ropa manchada o salpicada, S27
et: Võtta koheselt seljast saastunud riietus, S27
fi: Riisuttava välittömästi saastunut vaatetus, S27
fr: Enlever immédiatement tout vêtement souillé ou éclaboussé, S27
hu: A szennyezett ruhát azonnal le kell vetni, S27
it: Togliersi di dosso immediatamente gli indumenti contaminati, S27
lt: Nedelsiant nusivilkti visus užterštus drabužius, S27
lv: Nekavējoties novilkt notraipīto apgērbu, S27
mt: Inża' mill-ewwel kull ilbies imniġġes, S27
nl: Verontreinigde kleding onmiddellijk uittrekken, S27
no: Tilsølte klær må fjernes straks, S27
pl: Natychmiast zdjąć całą zanieczyszczoną odzież, S27
pt: Retirar imediatamente todo o vestuário contaminado, S27
sk: Okamžite si vyzlečte kontaminovaný odev, S27
sl: Takoj sleči vso onesnaženo obleko, S27
sv: Tag genast av alla nedstänkta kläder, S27

en: After contact with skin\, take off immediately all contaminated clothing\, and wash immediately with plenty of… (to be specified by the manufacturer), S27/28
cs: Po styku s kůží okamžitě odložte veškeré kontaminované oblečení a kůži okamžitě omyjte velkým množstvím… (vhodnou kapalinu specifikuje vý robce), S27/28
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut beschmutzte\, getränkte Kleidung sofort ausziehen und Haut sofort abwaschen mit viel… (vom Hersteller anzugeben), S27/28
dk: Kommer stof på huden\, tages tilsmudset tøj straks af og der vaskes med store mængder… (angives af fabrikanten), S27/28
el: Σε περίπτωση επαφής µε το δέρµα\, αφαιρέστε αµέσως όλα τα µολυσµένα ρούχα και πλύνετε αµέσως µε άφθονο… (το είδος του υγρού καθορίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S27/28
es: Después del contacto con la piel\, quítese inmediatamente toda la ropa manchada o salpicada y lávese inmediata y abundantemente con… (productos a especificar por el fabricante), S27/28
et: Nahale sattumisel võtta koheselt seljast saastunud riietus ja pesta koheselt rohke… (määrab valmistaja), S27/28
fi: Ihokosketuksen jälkeen\, saastunut vaatetus on riisuttava välittömästi ja roiskeet huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä… (aineen ilmoittaa valmistaja/maahantuoja), S27/28
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, enlever immédiatement tout vêtements souillé ou éclaboussé et se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec… (produits appropriés à indiquer par le fabricant), S27/28
hu: Ha az anyag a bőrre jut\, a szennyezett ruhát rögtön le kell vetni és a bőrt kellő mennyiségű …- val/-vel azonnal le kell mosni (az anyagot a gyártó határozza meg), S27/28
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle\, togliersi di dosso immediatamente gli indumenti contaminati e lavarsi immediatamente e abbondantemente con… (prodotti idonei da indicarsi da parte del fabbricante), S27/28
lt: Patekus ant odos\, nedelsiant nusivilkti visus užterštus drabužius ir gerai nuplauti… (kuo — nurodo gamintojas), S27/28
lv: Ja nokļūst uz ādas\, nekavējoties novilkt visu notraipīto apgērbu un skalot ar lielu daudzumu… (norāda ražotājs), S27/28
mt: Jekk imiss il-ġilda\, inża' mill-ewwel l-ilbies imniġġes kollu\, u ahsel immedjatament b'ħafna… (ikun speċifikat mill-manifattur), S27/28
nl: Na contact met de huid\, alle besmette kleding onmiddellijk uittrekken en de huid onmiddellijk wassen met veel… (aan te geven door de fabrikant), S27/28
no: Får man stoff på huden\, fjernes tilsølte klær straks og vaskes straks med rikelig… (angis av produsent eller importør), S27/28
pl: W przypadku zanieczyszczenia skóry natychmiast zdjąć całą zanieczyszczoną odzież i przemyć zanieczyszczoną skórę dużą ilością… (rodzaj cieczy określi producent), S27/28
pt: Em caso de contacto com a pele\, retirar imediatamente toda a roupa contaminada e lavar imediata e abundantemente com… (produto adequado a indicar pelo produtor), S27/28
sk: Pri kontakte s pokožkou okamžite vyzlečte kontaminovaný odev a pokožku okamžite a dôkladne umyte… (vhodný prípravok uvedie výrobca), S27/28
sl: Po stiku s kožo nemudoma sleči vso onesnaženo obleko in prizadeto kožo nemudoma izprati z veliko… (sredstvo določi proizvajalec), S27/28
sv: Vid kontakt med huden\, tag genast av alla nedstänkta kläder och tvätta genast med mycket… (anges av tillverkaren), S27/28

en: After contact with skin\, take off immediately all contaminated clothing\, and wash immediately with plenty of water, S27/28.1
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut beschmutzte\, getränkte Kleidung sofort ausziehen und Haut sofort mit viel Wasser abwaschen, S27/28.1
dk: Kommer stof på huden\, tages tilsmudset tøj straks af og der vaskes med store mængder vand, S27/28.1
es: Después del contacto con la piel\, quítese inmediatamente toda la ropa manchada o salpicada y lávese inmediata y abundantemente con agua, S27/28.1
fi: Ihokosketuksen jälkeen\, saastunut vaatetus on riisuttava välittömästi ja roiskeet huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä vedella, S27/28.1
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, enlever immédiatement tout vêtements souillé ou éclaboussé et se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec d'eau, S27/28.1
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle\, togliersi di dosso immediatamente gli indumenti contaminati e lavarsi immediatamente e abbondantemente con acqua, S27/28.1
nl: Na contact met de huid\, alle besmette kleding onmiddellijk uittrekken en de huid onmiddellijk wassen met veel water, S27/28.1
no: Får man stoff på huden\, fjernes tilsølte klær straks og vaskes straks med rikelige mengder vann, S27/28.1
pt: Em caso de contacto com a pele\, retirar imediatamente toda a roupa contaminada e lavar imediata e abundantemente com água, S27/28.1
sv: Vid kontakt med huden\, tag genast av alla nedstänkta kläder och tvätta genast met mycket vatten, S27/28.1

en: After contact with skin\, take off immediately all contaminated clothing\, and wash immediately with plenty of water and soap, S27/28.2
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut beschmutzte\, getränkte Kleidung sofort ausziehen und Haut sofort mit viel Wasser und Seife abwaschen, S27/28.2
dk: Kommer stof på huden\, tages tilsmudset tøj straks af og der vaskes med store mængder vand og sæbe, S27/28.2
es: Después del contacto con la piel\, quítese inmediatamente toda la ropa manchada o salpicada y lávese inmediata y abundantemente con agua y jabón, S27/28.2
fi: Ihokosketuksen jälkeen\, saastunut vaatetus on riisuttava välittömästi  ja roiskeet huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä vedella ja saipulla, S27/28.2
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, enlever immédiatement tout vêtements souillé ou éclaboussé et se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec d'eau et du savon, S27/28.2
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle\, togliersi di dosso immediatamente gli indumenti contaminati e lavarsi immediatamente e abbondantemente con acqua e sapone, S27/28.2
nl: Na contact met de huid\, alle besmette kleding onmiddellijk uittrekken en de huid onmiddellijk wassen met veel water en zeep, S27/28.2
no: Får man stoff på huden\, fjernes tilsølte klær straks og vaskes straks med rikelige mengder vann og såpe, S27/28.2
pt: Em caso de contacto com a pele\, retirar imediatamente toda a roupa contaminada e lavar imediata e abundantemente com água e sabão, S27/28.2
sv: Vid kontakt med huden\, tag genast av alla nedstänkta kläder och tvätta genast med mycket tvål och vatten, S27/28.2

en: After contact with skin\, wash immediately with plenty of… (to be specified by the manufacturer), S28
cs: Při styku s kůží okamžitě omyjte velkým množstvím…(vhodnou kapalinu specifikuje výrobce), S28
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit viel… (vom Hersteller anzugeben), S28
dk: Kommer stof på huden vaskes straks med store mængder… (angives af fabrikanten), S28
el: Σε περίπτωση επαφής µε το δέρµα\, πλυθείτε αµέσως µε άφθονο …(το είδος του υγρού καθορίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S28
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con… (productos a especificar por el fabricante), S28
et: Nahale sattumisel pesta koheselt rohke… (määrab valmistaja), S28
fi: Roiskeet iholta huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä… (aineen ilmoittaa valmistaja/maahantuoja), S28
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec… (produits appropriés à indiquer par le fabricant), S28
hu: Ha az anyag a bőrre kerül\,… -val/vel bőven azonnal le kell mosni (az anyagot a gyártó határozza meg), S28
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle lavarsi immediatamente ed abbondantemente con… (prodotti idonei da indicarsi da parte del fabbricante), S28
lt: Patekus ant odos\, nedelsiant gerai nuplauti… (kuo — nurodo gamintojas), S28
lv: Ja nokļūst uz ādas\, nekavējoties skalot ar lielu daudzumu…(norāda ražotājs), S28
mt: F'każ ta' kuntatt mal-ġilda\, aħsel mill-ewwel b'ħafna… (ikun speċifikat mill- manifattur), S28
nl: Na aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk wassen met veel… (aan te geven door de fabrikant), S28
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med… (angis av produsent eller importør), S28
pl: Zanieczyszczoną skórę natychmiast przemyć dużą ilością… (cieczy okręslonej przez producenta), S28
pt: Após contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com… (produtos adequados a indicar pelo produtor), S28
sk: Po kontakte s pokožkou je potrebné ju umyt’ vel’kým množstvom… (bude špecifikované výrobcom), S28
sl: Ob stiku s kožo takoj izprati z obilo… (sredstvo določi proizvajalec), S28
sv: Vid kontakt med huden tvätta genast med mycket… (anges av tillverkaren), S28

en: After contact with skin\, wash immediately with plenty of water, S28.1
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit viel Wasser, S28.1
dk: Kommer stof på huden vaskes straks med store mængder vand, S28.1
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con mucho agua, S28.1
fi: Roiskeet iholta huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä vettä, S28.1
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec beaucoup d'eau, S28.1
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle lavarsi immediatamente ed abbondantemente con molta acqua, S28.1
nl: Na aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk wassen met veelwater, S28.1
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med rikelige mengder vann, S28.1
pt: Apos contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com água, S28.1
sv: Efter hudkontakt\, tvätta genast noggrant med mycket vatten, S28.1

en: After contact with skin\, wash immediately with water and soap, S28.2
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit viel Wasser und Seife, S28.2
dk: Kommer stof på huden vaskes straks med vand og sæbe, S28.2
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con agua y jabón, S28.2
fi: Roiskeet iholta huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä vettä ja saippuaa, S28.2
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec de l'eau et du savon, S28.2
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle lavarsi immediatamente ed abbondantemente con acqua e sapone, S28.2
nl: Na aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk wassen met veel wateren zeep, S28.2
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med rikelige mengder vann og såpe, S28.2
pt: Apos contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com água e sabão, S28.2
sv: Efter hudkontakt\, tvätta genast noggrant med mycket vatten och tvål, S28.2

en: After contact with skin\, wash immediately with acetic acid 3 % and plenty of water, S28.3
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit Essigsäure 3% und viel Wasser, S28.3
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con ácido acético al 3 % y mucho agua, S28.3
fi: Roiskeet iholta huuhdeltava välittömästi 3 % : sella etikkahapolla ja runsaalla vedellä., S28.3
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec de l'acide acétique a 3 % et beaucoup d'eau, S28.3
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle lavarsi immediatamente ed abbondantemente con acido acetico al 3 % e acqua, S28.3
nl: Na aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk wassen met 3%-igazijnzuur en veel water, S28.3
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med 3 % eddiksyre og rikelige mengder vann, S28.3
pt: Apos contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com ácido acético a 3% e muita água, S28.3
sv: Efter hudkontakt\, tvätta genast noggrant med 3 %:ig ättiksyra och mycket vatten, S28.3

en: After contact with skin\, wash immediately with polyethylene glycol\, followed by plenty of water, S28.4
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit Polyethylenglykol\, anschließend mit viel Wasser, S28.4
dk: Kommer stof på huden vaskes straks med polyethylenglykol\, herefter med rigelig vand, S28.4
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con polietilenoglicol y mucho agua, S28.4
fi: Roiskeet iholta huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä polyetyleeniglykolia ja sen jälkeen vedellä, S28.4
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec du polyéthyleneglycol\, puis beaucoup d'eau, S28.4
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle lavarsi immediatamente ed abbondantemente con polietilenglicole e quindi con acqua, S28.4
nl: Na aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk wassen met polyethyleenglycol en vervolgens met veel water, S28.4
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med polyetylenglykol\, deretter med rikelige mengder vann, S28.4
pt: Apos contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com polietilenoglicol\, em seguida com bastante água, S28.4
sv: Efter hudkontakt\, tvätta genast noggrant med polyetylenglykol och därutöver med mycket vatten, S28.4

en: After contact with skin\, wash off immediately with cooking oil or acetic acid 0.5---1 %\, then cleanse thoroughly withsoap and water, S28.5
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit Speiseöl oder 0,5 - 1%iger Essigsäure\, dann gründlich mit Wasser und Seife reinigen, S28.5
dk: Kommer stof på huden vaskes straks med spiseolie eller 0,1---1 %ig eddikesyre\, herefter med rigelig vand og sæbe, S28.5
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con aceite comestible o ácido acético al 0,5---1 % y\, a continuación\, lávese a fondo con agua y jabón, S28.5
fi: Roiskeet iholta huuhdeltava heti ruokaöljyllä tai 0,5 - 1 % : sella etikkahappoliuoksella\, jonka jälkeen pesu vedellä ja saippualla, S28.5
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec de l'huile de table ou de l'acide acétique à 0,5 ou 1 %\, puis laver abondamment à l'eau savonneuse, S28.5
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle lavarsi immediatamente ed abbondantemente con olio commestibile o con acido acetico allo 0,5---1 %\, quindi lavare accuratamente con acqua e sapone, S28.5
nl: Na aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk wassen met spijsolie of 0,5---1 gew. % azijnzuur\, vervolgens met overvloedig water en zeep reinigen, S28.5
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med matolje eller 0,5---1 % eddiksyre\, deretter med rikelige mengder vann og såpe, S28.5
pt: Apos contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com azeite de mesa ou ácido acético a 0,5---1%\, e então abundantemente com água e sabão, S28.5
sv: Efter hudkontakt\, tvätta genast noggrant med matolja eller ättika 0,5 till 1 %. Rengör därefter noggrant med tvål och vatten, S28.5

en: After contact with skin\, wash immediately with plenty of polyethylene glycol/ethanol (1:1), S28.6
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit viel Polyethylenglykol/Ethanol (1:1)., S28.6
dk: Kommer stof på huden vaskes straks med store mængder polyethylenglykol/ætanol (1:1)., S28.6
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con mucho polietilenglicol/etanol (1:1), S28.6
fi: Poiskeet iholta huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä polyetyleeniglykoli/etanoliseoksella (1:1)., S28.6
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec un mélange de polyéthylèneglycol/éthanol (1:1), S28.6
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle lavarsi immediatamente ed abbondantemente con polietilenglicole/etanolo (1:1)., S28.6
nl: Na aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk wassen met veel polyethyleenglycol/ethanol (1:1)., S28.6
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med store mengder polyethylenglykol/etanol (1:1), S28.6
pt: Apos contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com polietilenoglicol/etanol (1:1), S28.6
sv: Efter hudkontakt\, tvätta genast noggrant med stora mängder av polyetylenglykol/etanol (1:1), S28.6

en: After contact with skin\, wash immediately with plenty of cuprous sulphate solution 2%, S28.7
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit viel Kupfersulfatlösung 2%, S28.7
dk: Kommer stof på huden vaskes straks med store mængder kobbersulfatopløsning 2%, S28.7
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con mucha solución de sulfato de cobre al 2%, S28.7
fi: Roiskeet iholta huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä 2-%:sta kuparisulfaattiliuosta., S28.7
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec une solution de sulfate de cuivre à 2%, S28.7
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle lavarsi immediatamente ed abbondantemente con soluzione di solfato di rame al 2%, S28.7
nl: Na aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk wassen met een overvloedige oplossing van kopersulfaat 2%, S28.7
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med store mengder kobbersulfatløsning 2 %, S28.7
pt: Apos contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com solução de sulfato de cobre a 2%, S28.7
sv: Efter hudkontakt\, tvätta genast noggrant med stora mängder av 2-% kopparsulfatlösning, S28.7